Hawaii statutes.
[§200-27] Police reports. For the
purpose of enforcement, it shall be incumbent upon the director of public
safety and the police chief of each county to transmit to the department a copy
of every investigation report submitted by the director of public safety and
the police chief's subordinate officers which relate to boating accidents or
the theft, loss, or recovery of vessels required to be registered and numbered
pursuant to section 200-31. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next